Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2927
Debt service coverage ratio; requirements.

(1) The investment program shall maintain a debt service coverage ratio consistent with prudent fiscal standards and bond covenants.

(2) No obligation shall be issued that would cause the debt or liability of the investment program to exceed available pledged revenue.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 27.
July 18, 2026